New York, session 2025-2026, S6570.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "accelerate solar for affordable power (ASAP) act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds that 4 increasing distributed solar energy capacity and lowering intercon- 5 nection costs are essential for achieving the state's affordability, 6 economic development, and environmental goals. It is the intent of the 7 legislature to amend the climate leadership and community protection act 8 to set a new target for distributed solar energy capacity and direct the 9 public service commission to advance reforms to the utility intercon- 10 nection process to ensure timely and cost-effective integration of new 11 distributed energy resources, such as solar and energy storage systems, 12 into the electric distribution system. 13 § 3. Paragraph e of subdivision 13 of section 75-0103 of the environ- 14 mental conservation law, as added by chapter 106 of the laws of 2019, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 e. Measures to achieve [six] twenty gigawatts of distributed solar 17 energy capacity installed in the state by two thousand [twenty-five] EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10828-02-6 S. 6570--A 2 1 thirty-five, nine gigawatts of offshore wind capacity installed by two 2 thousand thirty-five, a statewide energy efficiency goal of one hundred 3 eighty-five trillion British thermal units energy reduction from the two 4 thousand twenty-five forecast; and three gigawatts of statewide energy 5 storage capacity by two thousand thirty. 6 § 4. The public service law is amended by adding a new section 66-x to 7 read as follows: 8 § 66-x. Interconnection reforms. 1. (a) Within ninety days of the 9 effective date of this section the commission shall issue an order 10 requiring every electric corporation to file a report with the commis- 11 sion which shall include itemized costs of completed upgrades to the 12 electric distribution system required in order to interconnect new 13 distributed energy resources in the prior calendar categorized by 14 upgrade type and equipment type annually by March thirty-first. Such 15 reports shall be accompanied by sufficient supporting documentation as 16 determined by the commission, and shall be subject to inspection and 17 public comment before adoption by the commission. Adopted reports 18 received pursuant to this paragraph shall be the basis for electric 19 corporations to develop future distribution upgrade cost estimates. 20 (b) Electric corporations shall track actual costs of all distribution 21 upgrades they perform and disclose such costs to the department and to 22 the distributed energy resource company that paid for the upgrade. The 23 department shall maintain a database on its publicly accessible website 24 of all disclosed cost data and annual reports submitted pursuant to 25 paragraph (a) of this subdivision. 26 2. The commission shall consider proposals to create greater cost-cer- 27 tainty for distribution upgrades in order to limit the risk of uncapped 28 utility cost overruns, and the commission shall issue an order to 29 increase cost-certainty and counteract utility cost overruns within one 30 hundred eighty days of the effective date of this section. 31 § 5. Subdivision 1 of section 66-j of the public service law is 32 amended by adding a new paragraph (j) to read as follows: 33 (j) "Flexible interconnection" means the use of smart-grid technology 34 to monitor and actively manage distributed energy resources. 35 § 6. Section 66-j of the public service law is amended by adding two 36 new subdivisions 2-a and 6-a to read as follows: 37 2-a. Flexible interconnection. (a) The commission shall direct every 38 electric corporation to develop a proposal for a flexible intercon- 39 nection program to be established in the state. Within ninety days of 40 the effective date of this subdivision, electric corporations with 41 active flexible interconnection pilot projects shall file a flexible 42 interconnection implementation plan, including proposed tariff modifica- 43 tions and interconnection agreement contract language, with the commis- 44 sion. The commission shall solicit public comments on the electric 45 corporation proposals, consider alternative proposals, convene at least 46 two technical conferences, and consult with stakeholders throughout the 47 process of program development. Every electric corporation which does 48 not have an active flexible interconnection pilot project shall file 49 comments in response to the initial proposal and may file alternative 50 proposals for consideration. Within one year of the effective date of 51 this subdivision, the commission shall issue an order establishing a 52 uniform statewide flexible interconnection program. Such program shall 53 include clearly defined limits to annual energy curtailment for solar 54 energy systems and shall include transparent pricing for customer-funded 55 equipment, software and operating expenses. This program shall be tech- 56 nology agnostic, and electric corporations must consider customer-pro- S. 6570--A 3 1 posed flexible interconnection solutions that meet the technical 2 requirements of the electric corporation. 3 (b) The commission shall establish guidelines and timelines for the 4 implementation of flexible interconnection procedures to lower the cost 5 and shorten the timeline to integrate distributed energy resources. 6 6-a. Distributed energy resource capacity expansion. (a) Within three 7 months of the effective date of this subdivision, the commission shall 8 establish a distribution system investment program whose purpose is to 9 identify and direct electric corporations to implement proactive 10 distribution upgrades that create distributed energy resource hosting 11 capacity. Such program shall be integrated into the coordinated grid 12 planning process, and electric corporations shall submit annual reports 13 to the commission detailing actions taken and electric corporation 14 investments made to expand hosting capacity for distributed energy 15 resources. 16 (b) The commission shall establish a defined distribution system volt- 17 age threshold of 69KV, excluding any lines under federal energy regula- 18 tory commission jurisdiction, such that electric infrastructure owned by 19 electric corporations with a voltage at or below 69KV shall be consid- 20 ered distribution for the purposes of distributed energy resource inter- 21 connection and distributed energy resource compensation. All distributed 22 energy resources seeking to interconnect to the distribution system 23 shall be eligible for interconnection under the New York state standard- 24 ized interconnection requirements and shall be eligible for compensation 25 under the value of distributed energy resources tariff. 26 § 7. Implementation. 1. The New York state energy research and devel- 27 opment authority (NYSERDA), in collaboration with the department of 28 public service, is hereby directed to file a proposal to continue the 29 NY-Sun program to develop and implement initiatives necessary to cost- 30 effectively achieve the new distributed solar goal set forth in this 31 act. The implementation plan shall include incentives and other initi- 32 atives to support rooftop solar for homes and businesses as well as 33 community solar, with at least thirty-five percent of program investment 34 benefiting low- to moderate-income households and disadvantaged communi- 35 ties. The implementation plan may include rate design improvements and 36 additional interconnection reforms to lower the cost of the program. 37 2. From available funds, the public service commission is hereby 38 directed to issue an order authorizing additional funding to NYSERDA for 39 the continuation of the NY-Sun program. Such funding shall be sufficient 40 to support the development and implementation of the initiatives 41 required to meet the new distributed solar goal. NY-Sun funding may be 42 authorized by the commission in increments to control program costs, 43 provided that these increments must be sufficient to support at least 44 two gigawatts of solar energy capacity each. The commission shall ensure 45 that the NY-Sun program operates continuously, without interruption, 46 until the distributed solar goal is reached. 47 3. The public service commission is hereby directed to issue orders 48 necessary to effectuate the provisions and modifications set forth in 49 this act. 50 § 8. This act shall take effect immediately.